Florida, session 2026, SB1116.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 10 11 Section 1.âSubsection (1) of section 775.085, Florida 12 Statutes, is amended to read: 13 775.085âEvidencing prejudice while committing offense; 14 reclassification.â 15 (1)(a)âThe penalty for any felony or misdemeanor shall be 16 reclassified as provided in this subsection if the commission of 17 such felony or misdemeanor evidences prejudice based on the 18 race, color, ancestry, ethnicity, religion, sexual orientation, 19 national origin, homeless status, or advanced age of the victim 20 or prejudice based on the victim being a disabled adult: 21 1.âA misdemeanor of the second degree is reclassified to a 22 misdemeanor of the first degree. 23 2.âA misdemeanor of the first degree is reclassified to a 24 felony of the third degree. 25 3.âA felony of the third degree is reclassified to a felony 26 of the second degree. 27 4.âA felony of the second degree is reclassified to a 28 felony of the first degree. 29 5.âA felony of the first degree is reclassified to a life 30 felony. 31 (b)âAs used in paragraph (a), the term: 32 1.ââAdvanced ageâ means that the victim is older than 65 33 years of age. 34 2.ââDisabled adultâ means an individual 18 years of age or 35 older who suffers from a condition of physical or mental 36 incapacitation due to a developmental disability, organic brain 37 damage, or mental illness, or who has one or more physical or 38 mental limitations that restrict the personâs ability to perform 39 the normal activities of daily living. 40 3.ââHomeless statusâ means that the victim: 41 a.âLacks a fixed, regular, and adequate nighttime 42 residence; or 43 b.âHas a primary nighttime residence that is: 44 (I)âA supervised publicly or privately operated shelter 45 designed to provide temporary living accommodations; or 46 (II)âA public or private place not designed for, or 47 ordinarily used as, a regular sleeping accommodation for human 48 beings. 49 Section 2.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.